South Dakota, session 2026, SB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 41-8-39 be AMENDED:
41-8-39. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person to:
(1) Kill or attempt to kill any wild bird or animal from an aircraft, except as otherwise
provided for in § 41-8-39.1; or
(2) Use an aircraft for the purpose of hunting, taking, concentrating, driving, rallying,
stirring up, locating, or spotting any wild bird or animal, except that the prohibition
in this subdivision does not apply to a person who uses a drone for location and
recovery purposes, in accordance with the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this
Act, or to a person who uses a drone for the purpose of locating or spotting a
predator or varmint, if:
(a) The activity occurs only on or over land that is privately owned;
(b) The person operating the drone is the landowner or has permission from
the landowner or a lessee;
(c) The activity does not occur during the months of September, October, or
November; and
(d) The operation of the drone is in full compliance with all applicable Federal
Aviation Administration regulations.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-8:
A hunter may engage a pilot to use a drone for the purpose of locating and
recovering a deer or an elk if:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.874.9 2 201
(1) The deer or elk was mortally wounded by the hunter or the hunter reasonably
believes that the deer or elk was mortally wounded, while the hunter was lawfully
engaged in the hunt; and
(2) The hunter reasonably believes that the deer or elk cannot be located by commonly
used tracking methods.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 41-8:
The Game, Fish and Parks Commission shall, by rules promulgated in accordance
with chapter 1-26:
(1) Establish the hours during which a drone may be used for the purposes set forth
in section 2 of this Act;
(2) Establish technological capabilities and equipment that each drone must have and
may not have while being used for the purposes set forth in section 2 of this Act;
(3) Establish the time and manner in which the drone pilot may provide information
regarding the condition of the deer or elk and coordinates to the hunter; and
(4) Set forth the contact and location information that each drone pilot must provide
to the Department of Game, Fish and Parks electronically, before commencing an
operation for the purposes set forth in section 2 of this Act.
Any person who violates any rule promulgated under this section is guilty of a Class
1 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.